Illinois, session 104th, HB3628.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Legislative findings. For more than 4 decades, 5HIV/AIDS has ravaged communities across America and Illinois, 6doubling down on the racial health disparities also laid bare 7across the opioid epidemic, maternal and infant mortality 8rates, COVID-19 mortality and morbidity rates, and the rising 9rates of sexually transmitted infections (chlamydia, 10gonorrhea, and syphilis). 11    According to the Centers for Disease Control and 12Prevention (CDC), HIV transmission can be virtually eliminated 13when linkage to HIV medications and medical care are widely 14accessible. Treatment and prevention strategies such as 15Pre-Exposure Prophylaxis (PrEP) and 16Undetectable=Untransmittable (U=U) are time-tested, 17science-based interventions that prevent new HIV diagnoses. 18Pre-Exposure Prophylaxis (PrEP) is a prevention strategy that 19involves sexually active HIV-negative adults and adolescents 20taking prescription medications to prevent HIV acquisition. 21PrEP is 99% effective in preventing HIV when taken as 22prescribed. U=U acknowledges the proven science that people 23living with HIV who have an undetectable viral load pose no 24chance of transmitting the virus sexually. However, access to   HB3628- 2 -LRB104 09750 BDA 19816 b1health care, housing, steady and sufficient income, mental 2health and substance-use services, HIV treatment, addressing 3HIV-related stigma, and access to PrEP persist as barriers to 4lowering the HIV incidence rates across Illinois.5    To advance the goals and strategies of the Getting to Zero 6Illinois Plan 2.0 to end the HIV epidemic in Illinois by 2030, 7the State of Illinois will need to develop and support 8programs in health care, health disparities, housing, 9education and awareness. These new state funding opportunities 10for Fiscal Year 2026 aim to increase access to clinical and 11supportive services for HIV treatment and PrEP.12    Additionally, these investments are grounded in racial 13health equity to address the health disparities experienced by 14people living with or vulnerable to HIV-especially among our 15Black, Latino/a/x, and LGBTQIA communities. 16    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Department of 18Public Health for expenses of programs related to Acquired 19Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and Human Immunodeficiency 20Virus (HIV): 21     OFFICE OF HEALTH PROTECTION: AIDS/HIV22     No less than one-half (50%) of all funds appropriated in 23any fiscal year to the Department of Public Health's Office of 24Health Protection: AIDS/HIV Division shall be used for   HB3628- 3 -LRB104 09750 BDA 19816 b1expenses pursuant to HIV/AIDS programs serving minority 2populations. 3Payable from the General Revenue Fund:4  For Expenses of AIDS/HIV Education, Drugs, 5  Services, Counseling, Testing, Outreach to 6  Minority Populations, Costs Associated with7  Correctional Facilities Counseling, Testing8  Referral and Partner Notification (CTRPN),9  and Patient and Worker Notification Pursuant10  to Public Act 87-763..........................$27,562,400 11  For Grants and Other Expenses for the Prevention12  and Treatment of HIV/AIDS and the Creation of an13  HIV/AIDS Service Delivery System to Reduce the14  the Disparity of HIV Infection and AIDS Cases15  Between African Americans and Other16  Population Groups..............................$4,000,000 17Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:18  For Expenses of Programs for 19  Prevention of AIDS/HIV...........................$7,250,000 20  For Expenses for Surveillance Programs and21  Seroprevalence Studies of AIDS/HIV.............$2,750,000   HB3628- 4 -LRB104 09750 BDA 19816 b1  For Expenses Associated with the Ryan White2  Comprehensive AIDS Resource Emergency Act of3  1990 (CARE) and other AIDS/HIV services......$100,000,000 4Payable from the Quality of Life Endowment Fund:5  For Grants and Expenses Associated with HIV/AIDS6  Prevention and Education.......................$1,000,000 7    Total                                        $142,562,400 8    Section 10. The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the African-American 10HIV/AIDS Response Fund to the Department of Public Health for 11grants and administrative expenses associated with the 12prevention and treatment of HIV/AIDS and the creation of an 13HIV/AIDS service delivery system to reduce the disparity of 14HIV infection and AIDS cases among African-Americans. 15    Section 15. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Public 17Health from the General Revenue Fund for expenses of programs 18related to the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) and 19human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and specifically to the 20Getting to Zero-Illinois (GTZ) plan to end the HIV epidemic by 212030.   HB3628- 5 -LRB104 09750 BDA 19816 b1    Section 20. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Public 3Health from the General Revenue Fund for expenses of programs 4related to the prevention, screening, and treatment services 5to address sexually transmitted infection (STI) cases. 6    Section 25. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Public 8Health from the General Revenue Fund for expenses of programs 9related to the PrEP4Illinois Program to provide client 10navigation for pre-exposure prophylaxis services and 11medication access. A portion of this funding must be spent on 12establishing the mechanism, process, policy, or system needed 13to allow the PrEP4Illinois program to pay for the ancillary 14services (including, but not limited to, provider office 15visits or labs) associated with being on pre-exposure 16prophylaxis, as well as to begin covering the cost of such 17ancillary services for the uninsured and underinsured people 18in the Department of Public Health's PrEP4Illinois program. 19    Section 30. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Department of Public Health for grants, expenses 22of programs and administrative costs related to the 23implementation of the Rapid Start for HIV treatment pilot 24program. A portion of this funding shall be used to cover   HB3628- 6 -LRB104 09750 BDA 19816 b1administrative expenses to hire an HIV Treatment Innovation 2Coordinator that will develop and execute a comprehensive 3strategy to adopt a Rapid Start model for HIV treatment as the 4standard of care. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62025.